District of Columbia statutes.
17-302

Regulation of appeals; record; costs.

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals may regulate, generally, all matters relating to appeals, whether in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals or in the court below. It may prescribe by rules what part of the proceedings in the court below shall constitute the record on appeal, and may require that the original papers, instead of copies thereof, be sent to it. It may not require that the record or briefs on appeal be printed. If they are printed, the cost of printing may not be taxed as costs in the case.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 613, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
This section is referenced in § 47-895.22.
1981 Ed., § 17-302.
1973 Ed., § 17-302.